Washington statutes.
RCW 17.26.010

Restriction on state agencies and local governments.

State agencies and local governments may not use any other local, state, or federal permitting requirement, regulatory authority, or legal mechanism to override the legislative intent and statutory mandates of chapter 255, Laws of 1995.

[ 1995 c 255 s 8.]